Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Chapter 11. Training Facilities

§ 33-11-1.
Acquisition of real estate.

The Adjutant General of this state may receive on behalf of the state conveyances of real property suitable for the construction of any required training facility. In accepting any such conveyance on behalf of the state, the state shall incur no liability for the purchase of such real estate unless it can be absorbed by the current appropriation for the operation of the military department. The Adjutant General is further empowered to enter into cooperative agreements with any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, of the state for the purpose of providing facilities for National Guard training purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-111; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 74, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-11-3.
Custody and use of training facilities.

The Adjutant General shall be the state custodian of training facilities. No training facility shall be used for any other than a strictly military purpose without the recommendation of the officer in charge thereof and approval of the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-112; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 75, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-11-5.
Maintenance of facilities.

The Adjutant General shall be responsible for the proper maintenance of training facilities and is authorized to expend funds appropriated for this purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-113; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 76; Laws, 1971, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after February 25, 1971.

§ 33-11-7.
Leasing of training facilities.

The Adjutant General of the state is authorized and empowered to lease for and on behalf of the Mississippi National Guard, and for its use and benefit, such real property within the state as may be necessary and suitable for military installations and training facilities or other military purposes. Said leases may be made for a period of not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years. Payments under such leases may be paid out of the military fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-114; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 77, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-11-9.
Indemnity clauses in leases acquired for camp site.

Whenever it shall become necessary or desirable to lease any lands to provide National Guard training facilities, the Adjutant General of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered to place in such leases any indemnity clauses that may be required to indemnify any owners of such lands for damages caused to such lands from training uses. Payment for any such damages shall only be made after written appraisal and estimate of such damages by representatives of the Mississippi state forestry commission. Such payment shall only be made from such funds as the Adjutant General may have available for such purposes or from such funds as may be appropriated by the legislature of the State of Mississippi for such purposes. If either the Adjutant General or the owner are dissatisfied with the amount of such damages as estimated by the state forestry commission representative, then the Adjutant General or such owner may appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the land is located within thirty (30) days from the receipt of such written appraisal and estimate for trial and determination, and either the owner or Adjutant General may appeal to the state supreme court from an adverse decision in the circuit court as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-115; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 78, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-11-11.
Tax-forfeited lands near Camp Shelby to become part of military reservation.

All tracts of lands belonging to private parties which touch upon and are adjacent to or located within the area of the present military reservation comprising the permanent National Guard camp site and firing ranges in Forrest and Perry Counties, Mississippi, known as Camp Shelby, which have been or may hereafter be forfeited to the State of Mississippi for nonpayment of taxes and are owned by the state shall be held and retained by the State of Mississippi as additions to and as a part of said Camp Shelby military reservation. No tax patents shall be issued therefor to private parties unless the Camp Shelby committee, composed of the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi, the United States property and disbursing officer of the State of Mississippi, and the senior National Guard officer from the infantry, artillery, engineers, medical corps, and quartermaster corps, shall first certify in writing to the land commissioner of the State of Mississippi that such forfeited tax lands are not needed for said military reservation or an expansion thereof, which certificate shall be made in duplicate, the original thereof to be attached to the application for any such patents and the copy attached to and be made a part of any patent issued therefor. No forfeited tax lands shall be withheld from sale or patent by the state for a period longer than six (6) months from the date of maturity of title thereof in the State of Mississippi unless the Governor shall, by proclamation prior to the expiration of such six (6) months period, set aside and dedicate such lands as part of the Camp Shelby military reservation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1940, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1940).

§ 33-11-13.
Exchange of parcels of military reservation for lands vital to its purposes.

The Camp Shelby committee, composed of the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi, the United States property and disbursing officer for the State of Mississippi, and the senior National Guard officer from the infantry, artillery, engineers, medical corps, and quartermaster corps, with the advice and consent of the Governor of Mississippi, are hereby authorized to negotiate and enter into trades with private parties owning lands within, or within the vicinity of, the military reservation comprising the permanent National Guard camp site in Forrest and Perry Counties, Mississippi, known as Camp Shelby, which private lands, in the opinion of the committee, are needed for said permanent camp site and firing ranges, by exchanging therefor parcels of state lands belonging to said military reservation, which parcels, in the judgment of said committee, are not needed for or as vital to said camp site and firing ranges as the parcels owned by private persons to be acquired in exchange therefor.

The committee shall make a finding that the lands to be so acquired are more vital and essential to the needs and betterment of said permanent camp site and firing ranges than parcels of state lands to be exchanged therefor, and such exchanges shall be approved by the Department of Defense. In no case shall the state lands so exchanged exceed in acreage the lands acquired in exchange therefor.

The state lands to be so exchanged shall be conveyed by deeds executed by the Governor of Mississippi, attested by the secretary of state under the great seal of the State of Mississippi, and approved by all the members of the said Camp Shelby committee.

The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall pass upon the title and the deeds to the lands to be acquired, and shall approve their legality before they are accepted by the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1940, ch. 306, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1940).

§ 33-11-15.
Leases to United States authorized for National Guard armories.

The Adjutant General of Mississippi, in his discretion, subject to the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General, is hereby authorized and empowered to execute leases to the United States of America on lands held through deed or lease by the State of Mississippi for National Guard purposes, for the purpose of securing construction of Air National Guard armories thereon at the expense of the federal government. Likewise, the governing board of any county, municipality or school district is authorized to lease lands to the United States for such purpose, and the Adjutant General of Mississippi and said governing boards are authorized to execute such instruments as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8590.5; Laws, 1955, Ex. ch. 123.

§ 33-11-17.
Mineral leasing of Camp Shelby site.

The Adjutant General is authorized to lease the Camp Shelby training site for oil and gas and other minerals exploration and to expend revenues therefrom in maintaining and developing the facilities.

He shall cause to be published a legal notice of the proposed lease once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in Forrest, Harrison and Hinds Counties and in not less than one (1) oil and gas periodical having general circulation in this state, with the last publication to be completed not less than ten (10) days from the date sealed bids are to be received. All bids will be accompanied by a five percent (5%) bid bond in the form of a certified or cashier’s check or in the form of a bid bond of a surety company qualified to do business in this state. If the Adjutant General deems the highest and best bid acceptable, he will make his recommendations in writing to the state oil and gas board for its consideration. The board is hereby authorized to either approve or disapprove the bid or bids, which action shall become final. Any such lease executed by the Adjutant General for oil, gas and for other minerals shall contain contractual provisions which shall not be for more than seven-eighths (7/8) of such oil, gas and for other minerals, retaining to the state at least one-eighth (1/8) royalty to be paid as prescribed by the state oil and gas board. No lease shall be for a primary term in excess of six (6) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-113; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 76; Laws, 1971, ch. 326, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1971).

§ 33-11-18.
Sale or disposal of minerals, timber and other forest products taken from Camp Shelby military reservation.

In order to conserve and promote timber development at Camp Shelby, Mississippi, the state forestry commission is directed to lend its services, advice and recommendations to the Adjutant General of Mississippi in developing a sound timber management program on state-owned lands in said military reservation.

The Adjutant General is authorized and empowered to sell such trees, timber, stumps, naval stores faces or other forest products on state-owned lands in the military reservation at Camp Shelby, Mississippi, as shall be recommended by the state forestry commission and to secure the services of the state forestry commission in the reforestation and use of planting, cutting and practices recommended by the state forestry commission. The Adjutant General, however, is empowered to cut timber to provide clearing for military purposes and for rights-of-way without recommendation of the state forestry commission, and is authorized to sell such timber at the prevailing scale without advertising for bids, when the value thereof is estimated at less than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) by the state forestry commission. Based on the recommendation and value estimate of the state forestry commission, the Adjutant General is authorized to sell at the prevailing price, without advertising for bids, timber which has been damaged by storm, fire, insect, disease or otherwise. Based on recommendations by the state forestry commission, as provided by the timber management program, the Adjutant General may dispose of nonmarketable timber that is diseased or has been deadened by the state forestry commission, authorizing noncommercial public cutting when considered in the best interest of the state. Provided, however, that before any other sale of timber may be made as herein authorized, the Adjutant General shall advertise for bids on said timber in a newspaper of general circulation in the State of Mississippi at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date upon which bids are to be received.

The Adjutant General is hereby authorized to pay all of the funds derived from any timber and other forest product sales on state-owned lands in said reservation into a special fund in the state treasury, which shall be a revolving fund, to be used for the maintenance, development and improvement of said military reservation at Camp Shelby, Mississippi, and out of which the Adjutant General may pay the state forestry commission the cost incurred by the state forestry commission in selecting and cutting trees, tree planting, elimination of undesirable trees and shrubs, construction of fire lanes, control of insect and disease outbreaks, and other desirable aspects of forest management practices on this military reservation for the benefit of this military reservation.

The Adjutant General of Mississippi, with concurrence of the commission of budget and accounting, may pay from available Camp Shelby timber funds, restitution for timber and/or minerals cut and/or removed without permission, by employees or authorized agents of the state military department, from private property whose sales, use or damage shall have enriched and/or benefited the state military department.

The funds derived from any timber and other forest product sales as herein provided shall be paid by the state treasurer upon warrants issued by the state auditor of public accounts and the said auditor shall issue his warrant upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law for funds appropriated for support of the Mississippi National Guard.

The Adjutant General shall make an annual report to the legislature on receipts and disbursements in connection with all funds derived from minerals, timber and other forest product sales on state-owned lands at the Camp Shelby military reservation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1984).

§ 33-11-19.
Procurement of federal funds.

The Adjutant General, subject to the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to negotiate for, accept and approve projects, proposals, contracts and agreements for the construction, reconstruction, expansion, conversion, purchase, lease, repair, rehabilitation, improvement, equipping, furnishing, maintenance and operation, in whole or in part with federal funds, of armories, camps, ranges, bases or any building, structure or facility for the organized militia.

When federal funds are made available or provided by the United States to the state either directly or by way of reimbursement in whole or in part for any monies expended by the state for the construction, demolition, reconstruction, expansion, conversion, purchase, lease, repair, rehabilitation, improvement, equipping, furnishing, maintenance and operation of any armory, camp, range, base, building, structure or facility for the organized militia, the Adjutant General of the state is hereby authorized to receive such funds in behalf of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-116; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 79, eff from and after June 1, 1966.